Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 34.
RIGHTS OF LABOR.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by initiated petition and approved at the general election on Nov. 7, 1944, by a vote of 105,300 for and 87,652 against. See Acts 1945, p. 770.

§ 1. Discrimination for or against union labor prohibited.

No person shall be denied employment because of membership in or affiliation with or resignation from a labor union, or because of refusal to join or affiliate with a labor union; nor shall any corporation or individual or association of any kind enter into any contract, written or oral, to exclude from employment members of a labor union or persons who refuse to join a labor union, or because of resignation from a labor union; nor shall any person against his will be compelled to pay dues to any labor organization as a prerequisite to or condition of employment.

§ 2. Enforcement of amendment — Legislation authorized.

The General Assembly shall have power to enforce this article by appropriate legislation.

Cross References.

Right to employment, § 11-3-301 et seq.